Utah statutes.
65A-6-12.   Agreements for the administration of mineral leases by a federal
agency.
(1)  If the state has succeeded or will succeed to the position of the United
States under a federal mineral or prospecting permit in which only a portion
of the lands are subject to the permit, agreements may be entered into with
the federal agency having jurisdiction over the remaining portion providing
for the continued administration by that agency of the entire lease or permit
or any lease pursuant to that permit.
(2)  Consideration for continued administration of the federal agency may not
exceed 10% of the revenue allocable to the state's portion.
